Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.355

Automatic registration and automatic sign-up to register—Enhanced driver's licenses and identicards.

(1) The department of licensing must collect and transmit to the secretary of state voter registration information for all citizens applying for, renewing, or updating an enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard by automated process at the time of registration, renewal, or change of address if:

(a) The person meets requirements for voter registration;

(b) The person has received or is renewing an enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard issued under RCW 46.20.202 or is changing the address for an existing enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard pursuant to RCW 46.20.205; and

(c) The department of licensing record associated with the applicant contains:

(i) The data required to determine whether the applicant meets requirements for voter registration under RCW 29A.08.010;

(ii) Other information as required by the secretary of state; and

(iii) A signature image.

(2) The department of licensing must collect and transmit to the secretary of state voter registration information for all citizens applying for, renewing, or updating an enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard 16 or 17 years of age if:

(a) The person meets requirements to sign up to register to vote;

(b) The person has received or is renewing an enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard issued under RCW 46.20.202 or is changing the address for an existing enhanced driver's license or enhanced identicard pursuant to RCW 46.20.205; and

(c) The department of licensing record associated with the applicant contains:

(i) The data required to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements for voter registration under RCW 29A.08.210, other than age;

(ii) Other information as required by the secretary of state; and

(iii) A signature image.

[ 2023 c 466 s 14; 2020 c 208 s 7; 2018 c 110 s 102.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 466 ss 3, 4, 6, 11, 13-16, and 20-23: See note following RCW 29A.08.030.

Effective date—2020 c 208 ss 7, 8, 18, 20, and 21: "Sections 7, 8, 18, 20, and 21 of this act take effect September 1, 2023." [ 2020 c 208 s 25.]

Short title—Findings—2020 c 208: See notes following RCW 29A.08.210.

Effective date—2018 c 110 ss 101-107: "Sections 101 through 107 of this act take effect July 1, 2019." [ 2018 c 110 s 208.]

Short title—2018 c 110: "This act may be known and cited as the automatic voter registration act of 2018." [ 2018 c 110 s 1.]

Findings—Intent—2018 c 110: "(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) The right to vote is enshrined as one of the greatest virtues of our democracy and that an engaged citizenry is essential at each level of government to ensure that all voices are heard; and

(b) State and local governments should take every step possible to make it easier to vote in Washington state and ensure that fundamental values of a true democracy with full participation remains one of our most important functions. Providing additional opportunities for people to register to vote and helping them make their own choices about who represents them in this democracy and about important issues that are central to their lives and communities are essential to upholding these values.

(2) Therefore, the legislature intends to increase the opportunity to register to vote for persons qualified under Article VI of the Washington state Constitution by expanding the streamlined voter registration process that will increase opportunities for voter registration without placing new undue burdens on government agencies." [ 2018 c 110 s 2.]